Wisconsin, session 2025, AB916.
do enact as follows:AB916,11Section 1. 20.490 (7) of the statutes is created to read:AB916,2,4220.490 (7) Housing programs. (g) Home repair program. Fifty percent of 3the moneys transmitted to the state under s. 77.24 for the program under s. 4234.663.AB916,25Section 2. 234.663 of the statutes is created to read:AB916,2,66234.663 Home repair program. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB916,2,87(a) “Affordable housing” means rental housing to which all of the following 8apply:AB916,3,291. The estimated annual housing costs, as defined in s. 16.301 (3), do not 10exceed, or are not expected to exceed, 30 percent of 100 percent of the area median 11income, with family size determined using the federal imputed income limitation, 12as defined in 26 USC 42 (g) (2) (C), and the utility-related costs if not included in the 1rent equal the utility allowance determined by the federal department of housing 2and urban development.AB916,3,432. The housing is for occupancy by individuals whose annual household 4income does not exceed 100 percent of the area median income.AB916,3,75(b) “Area median income” means the area median family income in the county 6in which the housing is located, adjusted for family size, as published annually by 7the federal department of housing and urban development.AB916,3,108(c) “Eligible homeowner” means an individual whose annual household 9income does not exceed 100 percent of the area median income and who is any of the 10following:AB916,3,11111. An owner of record and occupant of a residential housing unit.AB916,3,13122. An owner and occupant of a manufactured home who leases a space in a 13manufactured home community.AB916,3,16143. An equitable owner and occupant of a residential housing unit who can 15demonstrate an ownership interest in the residential housing unit by establishing 16that the individual is any of the following:AB916,3,1717a. A party to a contract to purchase the residential housing unit.AB916,3,1918b. An owner of record of the residential housing unit prior to a fraudulent 19conveyance of the residential housing unit.AB916,3,2120c. A trust beneficiary holding a partial ownership interest in the residential 21housing unit.AB916,3,2422(d) “Eligible landlord” means a landlord that, in the landlord’s capacity as a 23landlord, has an ownership stake in no more than 5 properties and no more than 15 24residential housing units, which the landlord rents for use as affordable housing.AB916,4,21(e) “Habitability concern” means a condition that prevents a residential 2housing unit from being any of the following:AB916,4,331. Fit for human habitation.AB916,4,542. Free from defective conditions or health and safety hazards, including 5asbestos, mold, pests, and lead.AB916,4,763. Free from conditions preventing the installation of measures to improve 7energy or water efficiency and lower utility costs.AB916,4,88(f) “Manufactured home” has the meaning given in s. 101.91 (2).AB916,4,119(g) “Residential housing unit” means a dwelling unit used or intended to be 10used as an occupant’s primary residence. “Residential housing unit” includes 11manufactured homes.AB916,4,1412(2) Establishment of program. The authority shall establish and 13administer a home repair program to award grants under sub. (3) and loans under 14sub. (4) for all of the following purposes:AB916,4,1615(a) To ensure that residential housing units are free from habitability 16concerns.AB916,4,1717(b) To implement energy efficiency measures.AB916,4,1918(c) To make residential housing units accessible for individuals with 19disabilities.AB916,4,2220(3) Grants to homeowners. (a) From the appropriation under s. 20.490 (7) 21(g), the authority shall award grants of up to $25,000 per residential housing unit to 22eligible homeowners for activities specified under sub. (5) (a) 2.AB916,5,223(b) The authority shall prioritize awarding grants under par. (a) to eligible 1homeowners with disabilities and eligible homeowners with children 5 years of age 2or younger.AB916,5,53(c) The authority may not award a grant under par. (a) for a residential 4housing unit that was constructed more than 40 years nor less than 10 years before 5the eligible homeowner applied for the grant.AB916,5,86(4) Loans to landlords. (a) From the appropriation under s. 20.490 (7) (g), 7the authority shall award loans of up to $25,000 per residential housing unit to 8eligible landlords for activities specified under sub. (5) (a) 3.AB916,5,99(b) The authority may not charge interest on any loan awarded under par. (a).AB916,5,1210(c) The authority may not award a loan under par. (a) for a residential housing 11unit that was constructed more than 40 years nor less than 10 years before the 12eligible landlord applied for the loan.AB916,5,1513(5) Administration requirements; the authority. (a) The authority shall 14establish policies and procedures to administer the program under sub. (2), 15including all of the following:AB916,5,17161. Policies and procedures for accepting applications for grants under sub. (3) 17and loans under sub. (4).AB916,5,19182. Specifying standards for repair and rehabilitation activities conducted by 19eligible homeowners using grant funds awarded under sub. (3).AB916,5,21203. Specifying standards for repair and rehabilitation activities conducted by 21eligible landlords using loan funds awarded under sub. (4).AB916,5,23224. Specifying any additional requirements for eligible homeowners or eligible 23landlords that the authority deems necessary.AB916,6,224(b) The authority may establish policies and procedures specifying standards 1for the work performed using grant funds and loan funds awarded under this 2section. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab916 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab916 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB916 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB916 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB916: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting